hu: Csiszolómechanizmus anyaga: Szénacél; Kerámia; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Kő; Titán; Egyéb
nl: Materiaal van vermaalmechanisme: Koolstofstaal; Keramiek; Plastic; Roestvrij staal; Steen; Titanium; Overig
pt-PT: Material do mecanismo de moagem: Aço carbono; Cerâmica; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Pedra; Titânio; Outro
ru: Материал механизма помола: Углеродистая сталь; Керамика; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Камень; Титан; Другой
sk-SK: Materiál mlecieho mechanizmu: Uhlíková oceľ; Keramika; Plastový; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Kameň; Titán; Iné
en: Grinding mechanism material: Carbon steel; Ceramic; Plastic; Stainless steel; Stone; Titanium; Other
ro-RO: Materialul mecanismului de măcinare: Oțel carbon; Ceramică; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Piatră; Titan; Altele
zh-TW: 研磨機制材質: 碳素鋼; 陶瓷; 塑膠; 不銹鋼; 石製; 鈦; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на механизма за смилане: Въглеродна стомана; Керамика; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Камък; Титан; Друго
da: Kværnmekanismemateriale: Kulstofstål; Keramik; Plast; Rustfrit stål; Sten; Titanium; Andet
it: Materiale del meccanismo di macinazione: Acciaio al carbonio; Ceramica; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Pietra; Titanio; Altro
lt-LT: Malimo mechanizmo medžiaga: Anglinis plienas; Keramika; Plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Akmuo; Titanas; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal mehanizma mljevenja: Ugljični čelik; Keramika; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Kamen; Titanij; Ostalo
th: วัสดุของกลไกการบด: เหล็กคาร์บอน; เซรามิก; พลาสติก; เหล็กสเตนเลส; หิน; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό μηχανισμού άλεσης: Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Κεραμικό; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Πέτρα; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
ko: 분쇄 메커니즘 재질: 탄소강; 세라믹; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 석재; 티타늄; 기타
nb: Materiale for slipemekanisme: Karbonstål; Keramikk; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Stein; Titan; Annet
de: Material für Mahlmechanismus: Kohlenstoffstahl; Keramik; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Stein; Titan; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Material do mecanismo de moagem: Aço carbono; Cerâmica; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Pedra; Titânio; Outro
sl-SI: Material mehanizma za mletje: Ogljikovo jeklo; Keramika; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Kamen; Titan; Druga
zh-CN: 研磨机构材质: 碳钢; 陶瓷; 塑料; 不锈钢; 石材; 钛; 其他
fi: Jauhatusmekanismin materiaali: Hiiliteräs; Keraaminen; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Kivi; Titaani; Muu
es: Material del mecanismo de molienda: Acero al carbono; Cerámica; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Piedra; Titanio; Otros
pl: Materiał mechanizmu mielącego: Stal węglowa; Ceramika; Tworzywo sztuczne; Stal nierdzewna; Kamień; Tytan; Pozostałe
cs: Materiál mlecího mechanismu: Uhlíková ocel; Keramika; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Kámen; Titan; Jiné
sv: Material i slipmekanismen: Kolstål; Keramisk; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Sten; Titan; Övrigt
vi: Vật liệu cơ chế xay: Thép carbon; Gốm; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Đá; Titanium; Khác
tr: Öğütme mekanizması malzemesi: Karbon çelik; Seramik; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Taş; Titanyum; Diğer
fr: Matériau du mécanisme de broyage: Woks en acier au carbone; Céramique; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Pierre; Titane; Autre
ja: おろし機構の材質: カーボン鋼; セラミック; プラスチック; ステンレススチール; 石; チタン; その他